California, session 20252026, AB2188.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5549.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5549.5. (a) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5549, with the approval of the board, the general manager of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District may bind the district, in accordance with board policy that has been adopted in an open meeting, for the payment of equipment, supplies, materials, labor, or other valuable consideration for any purpose, including new construction of a building, structure, or improvement, in amounts not exceeding one hundred fifty seventy-two thousand dollars ($150,000). ($72,000). All expenditures shall be reported to the board of directors at its next regular meeting.(2) If the board delegates authority in the manner specified in paragraph (1) for a contract for the construction, completion, maintenance, or repair of any building, structure, or improvement, the decision by the general manager of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District shall be binding on the district. Nothing in this paragraph invalidates any existing protest and grievance procedures regarding that decision.(3) A district may, by action of the board in an open meeting, increase the amount by which the general manager may bind the district above the seventy-two-thousand-dollar ($72,000) limit established in paragraph (1). An increase made pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to 2 percent, for each fiscal year following the operative date of the last adjustment, of the amount in effect when the board’s action is adopted. (3)(4) If the estimated amount of a contract authorized pursuant to this subdivision exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the district shall solicit a minimum of three informal bids that permit prices and other terms to be compared. The district shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder, or the district may reject all bids and resolicit new bids or perform the work by force account. All solicitations and results shall be memorialized in writing and all awarded contracts shall be included in the report to the board required pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the because of the unique financial situations of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District affected by this act.